Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 4. Vital Records
§ 35-1-424.
Correction and amendment of vital records.

A certificate or record registered under this act [§§

35-1-401

through

35-1-431

] may be amended only in accordance with this act and regulations thereunder adopted by the division of health and medical services to protect the integrity and accuracy of vital records. A certificate that is amended under this section shall be marked “Amended” except as provided in subsection (d) of this section. The date of amendment and a summary description of the evidence submitted in support of the amendment shall be endorsed on or made a part of the record.

Vital records services shall prescribe by regulations the conditions under which additions or minor corrections shall be made to birth certificates within one (1) year after the date of birth without the certificate being considered as amended.

Upon receipt of a certified copy of a court order changing the name of a person born in this state and upon request of such person or his parent, guardian, or legal representative, the state registrar of vital records shall amend the certificate to reflect the new name, by attaching an abstract of the court order.

After one (1) year no correction shall be made on the face of the certificate.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S.1957, § 35-79.24.

Cross references. —

For authority to promulgate regulations, see §

35-1-404

.

Birth certificate amendments.—

District court erred in concluding that it lacked subject matter jurisdiction over a petition for an order recognizing petitioner’s change of sex and gender where it applied a presumption against district court jurisdiction, when Wyo. Const. art. 5, § 10, required a presumption in favor of jurisdiction, and Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-1-424(c) merely identified, and imposed requirements for, one type of vital records amendment, and as such, it did not affect district court jurisdiction. Moreover, the legislature had expressed no clear intention to limit the district court’s jurisdiction to amend birth certificates under the Vital Records Act, and agency regulations allowing amendment of a person’s sex on her birth certificate did not modify, dilute, or change in any way the statutory provisions from which the Wyoming Department of Health derived its authority. McMillan v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2020 WY 68, 464 P.3d 1215,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2020).

§ 35-1-425.
Reproduction of records.

To preserve original documents, the state registrar of vital records is authorized to prepare typewritten, photographic or other reproductions of original records and files in his office. Such reproductions when certified by him shall be accepted as the original record.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.25.

Cross references. —

For provisions governing public records, see §§

16-4-201

to

16-4-205

.

§ 35-1-426.
Disclosure of records.

To protect the integrity of vital records, to insure their proper use, and to insure the efficient and proper administration of the vital records system, it shall be unlawful for any person to permit inspection of, or to disclose information contained in vital records, or to copy or issue a copy of all or part of any such record except as authorized by regulations.

The department of health may authorize the disclosure of data contained in vital records for research purposes.

Information in vital records indicating that a birth occurred out of wedlock shall not be disclosed except as provided by regulations or upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

The department of health is authorized to provide the necessary information in death records to the secretary of state for the maintenance of the voter registration system by removing names of voters who are deceased from the voter registration list. This disclosure of death records shall be conducted in accordance with the terms agreed upon by the secretary of state and the director of the department of health.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.26; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2004, ch. 94, § 2.

Cross references. —

For provisions governing public records, see §§

16-4-201

to

16-4-205

.

As to voter registration, see Title 22, Chapter 3.

The 2004 amendment

added (d).

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

§ 35-1-427.
Copies of data from vital records.

Only the state registrar of vital records shall upon request issue a certified copy of any certificate or record in his custody or of a part thereof. Each copy issued shall show the date of registration and copies issued from records marked “Delayed”, “Amended”, or “Court Order” shall be similarly marked and show the effective date. A certified copy of a certificate or any part thereof, issued in accordance with this subsection shall be considered for all purposes the same as the original, and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated, except that the evidentiary value of a certificate or record filed more than six (6) months for birth, and one (1) year for death and marriage, after the event, or a record which has been amended, shall be determined by the judicial or administrative body or official before whom the certificate is offered as evidence.

The federal agency responsible for national vital statistics may be furnished such copies as it may require for national statistics if the state is reimbursed for the cost of furnishing the data, and the data is not used for other than statistical purposes by the federal agency responsible for national vital statistics.

Federal, state, local and other public or private agencies may, upon request, be furnished copies or data for statistical purposes upon such terms or conditions as may be prescribed by the department of health.

No person shall prepare or issue any certificate which purports to be an original, certified copy or copy of a certificate of birth, death or stillbirth, except as authorized by this act [§§

35-1-401

through

35-1-431

] or regulations adopted hereunder.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.27; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

See cross references to §§

35-1-425

and

35-1-426

.

§ 35-1-428.
Fees for copies and searches; surcharges.

The department of health shall in accordance with guidelines imposed upon boards and commissions under W.S.

33-1-201

, prescribe reasonable fees for certified copies of certificates or records or for a search of the files or records when no copy is made. Fees collected shall be deposited into the general fund.

In addition to fees imposed by department rule and regulation under subsection (a) of this section, the department shall collect a surcharge of five dollars ($5.00) for each copy of a certificate or record issued pursuant to this article and five dollars ($5.00) for each five (5) year period or portion thereof that a search of files or records is undertaken pursuant to this article. Revenues collected from the surcharge imposed under this subsection shall be deposited by the state treasurer in accordance with the following:

For the period from July 1, 2019 through June 30, 2024, seventy-five percent (75%) into the Wyoming children’s trust fund established under W.S. 14-8-106(a) and twenty-five percent (25%) into the Wyoming children’s income account established under W.S. 14-8-106(b);

Beginning July 1, 2024, one hundred percent (100%) into the Wyoming children’s trust fund established under W.S. 14-8-106(a).

In addition to the fees imposed by department of health rules under subsection (a) of this section and the surcharges imposed under subsection (b) of this section, the department shall collect a surcharge of five dollars ($5.00) for each copy of a death certificate issued pursuant to this article. Revenues collected from the surcharge imposed under this subsection shall be deposited by the department in the indigent persons burial account, which is hereby created. All funds within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer and all investment earnings from the account shall be deposited in the account. Subject to legislative appropriation, the department of family services shall disperse one-half (1/2) of the funds within the account to counties that made a request for reimbursement under W.S. 18-3-504(c) or 19-14-101(a) and the remaining one-half (1/2) of funds shall be available to the department of family services for expenses incurred under W.S. 42-2-103(c). If a legislative appropriation is insufficient to reimburse all county reimbursement requests, the department of family services shall disperse the available funds so that each county that made a reimbursement request receives equal percentage reimbursements.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.28; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1993, ch. 214, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2018 ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “W.S.

14-8-106

” for “W.S.

14-8-101

” in (b).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The additional fee authorized by this subsection shall not be assessed after the end of the first fiscal year in which the balance in the children's trust fund exceeds five million dollars ($5,000,000.00)."

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (b), added "in accordance with the following," added (b)(i), added (b)(ii) designation, and in present (b)(ii), added "Beginning July 1, 2024, one hundred percent (100%)" at the beginning and substituted "14-8-106(a)" for "14-8-106."

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added (c).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, directs: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Cross references. —

For provisions relative to public funds, see ch. 4 of title 9.

§ 35-1-429.
Persons required to keep records.

Every person in charge of an institution as defined in this act [§§

35-1-401

through

35-1-431

] shall keep a record of personal particulars and data concerning each person admitted or confined to the institution. The record shall be limited to information required by the standard certificate of birth, death and stillbirth forms issued under the provisions of this act. The record shall be made at the time of admission from information provided by the person, but when it cannot be so obtained, the same shall be obtained from relatives or other persons acquainted with the facts. The name and address of the person providing the information shall be a part of the record.

When a dead human body is released or disposed of by an institution, the person in charge of the institution shall keep a record showing the name of the deceased, date of death, name and address of the person to whom the body is released, date of removal from the institution, or if finally disposed of by the institution, the date, place and manner of disposition.

A funeral director, embalmer or other person who removes from the place of death or transports or finally disposes of a dead body or stillbirth, in addition to filing any certificate or other form required by this act, shall keep a record which shall identify the body, and such information pertaining to his receipt, removal, and delivery of the body as may be prescribed in regulations adopted by the division of health and medical services.

Records maintained under this section shall be retained for a period of not less than ten (10) years and shall be made available for inspection by the state registrar of vital records or his representative upon demand.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.29.

Cross references. —

For definition of “institution,” see §

35-1-401

.

§ 35-1-430.
Duties to furnish information relative to vital events.

Any person having actual knowledge of the facts shall furnish such information as he may possess regarding any birth, death, stillbirth, marriage or divorce upon demand of the state registrar of vital records.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.30.

§ 35-1-431.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully and knowingly: (i) makes any false statement in a report, record, or certificate required to be filed under this act [§§

35-1-401

through

35-1-431

], or in an application for an amendment thereof, or supplies false information intending that such information be used in the preparation of any such report, record, or certificate, or amendment thereof; or (ii) without lawful authority and with the intent to deceive, makes, alters, amends, or mutilates any report, record, or certificate required to be filed under this act or a certified copy of such report, record, or certificate; or (iii) uses or attempts to use, or furnish to another for use, for any purpose of deception, any certificate, record, report or certified copy thereof so made, altered, amended, or mutilated; or (iv) with the intention to deceive uses or attempts to use any certificate of birth or certified copy of a record of birth knowing that such certificate or certified copy was issued upon a record which is false in whole or in part or which relates to the birth of another person; or (v) furnishes a certificate of birth or certified copy of a record of birth with the intention that it be used by a person other than the person to whom the record of birth relates; shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or imprisoned not more than six (6) months, or both.

Any person who: (i) knowingly transports or accepts for transportation, interment, or other disposition a dead body without an accompanying permit as provided in this act; or (ii) refuses to provide information required by this act; or (iii) willfully neglects or violates any of the provisions of this act or refuses to perform any of the duties imposed upon him by this act; shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.31.

Editor's notes. —

Section 2, ch. 177, Laws 1973, provides: “This act shall be cumulative and shall supplement any other laws of the state of Wyoming relating to vital records, not inconsistent with the provisions hereof.”